Washington statutes.
RCW 43.03.011

Salaries of state elected officials of the executive branch.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 2025SALARYSCHEDULE.SL) ***

Pursuant to Article XXVIII, section 1 of the state Constitution and RCW 43.03.010 and 43.03.310, the annual salaries of the state elected officials of the executive branch shall be as follows:

(1) Effective July 1, 2022:

(a) Governor. . . . $190,632

(b) Lieutenant governor. . . . $119,353

(c) Secretary of state. . . . $136,996

(d) Treasurer. . . . $156,303

(e) Auditor. . . . $134,526

(f) Attorney general. . . . $175,274

(g) Superintendent of public instruction. . . . $155,678

(h) Commissioner of public lands. . . . $155,678

(i) Insurance commissioner. . . . $140,110

(2) Effective July 1, 2023:

(a) Governor. . . . $198,257

(b) Lieutenant governor. . . . $124,127

(c) Secretary of state. . . . $145,714

(d) Treasurer. . . . $162,555

(e) Auditor. . . . $145,714

(f) Attorney general. . . . $187,543

(g) Superintendent of public instruction. . . . $161,905

(h) Commissioner of public lands. . . . $161,905

(i) Insurance commissioner. . . . $145,714

(3) Effective July 1, 2024:

(a) Governor. . . . $204,205

(b) Lieutenant governor. . . . $127,851

(c) Secretary of state. . . . $150,085

(d) Treasurer. . . . $167,432

(e) Auditor. . . . $150,085

(f) Attorney general. . . . $193,169

(g) Superintendent of public instruction. . . . $166,762

(h) Commissioner of public lands. . . . $166,762

(i) Insurance commissioner. . . . $150,085

(4) The lieutenant governor shall receive the fixed amount of his or her salary plus 1/260th of the difference between his or her salary and that of the governor for each day that the lieutenant governor is called upon to perform the duties of the governor by reason of the absence from the state, removal, resignation, death, or disability of the governor.

[2023 c 1 s 1; 2021 c 1 s 1; 2019 c 5 s 1; 2017 1st sp.s. c 1 s 1; 2015 1st sp.s. c 1 s 1; 2013 c 340 s 1; 2011 c 380 s 1; 2009 c 581 s 1; 2009 c 549 s 5004; 2007 c 524 s 1; 2005 c 519 s 1; 2003 1st sp.s. c 1 s 1; 2001 1st sp.s. c 3 s 1; 1999 sp.s. c 3 s 1; 1997 c 458 s 1; 1995 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 1; 1993 sp.s. c 26 s 1; 1991 sp.s. c 1 s 1; 1989 2nd ex.s. c 4 s 1; 1987 1st ex.s. c 1 s 1, part.]